Illinois, session 104th, SB2677.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Owners Identification Card Act is 5amended by changing Sections 6 and 13.4 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 65/6)  (from Ch. 38, par. 83-6)7    Sec. 6. Contents of Firearm Owner's Identification Card. 8    (a) A Firearm Owner's Identification Card, issued by the 9Illinois State Police at such places as the Director of the 10Illinois State Police shall specify, shall contain the 11applicant's name, residence, date of birth, sex, physical 12description, recent photograph, except as provided in 13subsection (c-5), and signature. Each Firearm Owner's 14Identification Card must have the Firearm Owner's 15Identification Card number boldly and conspicuously displayed 16on the face of the card. The expiration date of a card issued 17on or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 18104th General Assembly must be boldly and conspicuously 19displayed on the face of the card. Each Firearm Owner's 20Identification Card must have printed on it the following: 21"CAUTION - This card does not permit bearer to UNLAWFULLY 22carry or use firearms." Before December 1, 2002, the 23Department of State Police may use a person's digital   SB2677- 2 -LRB104 14096 RLC 27228 b1photograph and signature from his or her Illinois driver's 2license or Illinois Identification Card, if available. On and 3after December 1, 2002, the Illinois State Police (formerly 4the Department of State Police) shall use a person's digital 5photograph and signature from his or her Illinois driver's 6license or Illinois Identification Card, if available. The 7Illinois State Police shall decline to use a person's digital 8photograph or signature if the digital photograph or signature 9is the result of or associated with fraudulent or erroneous 10data, unless otherwise provided by law.11    (b) A person applying for a Firearm Owner's Identification 12Card shall consent to the Illinois State Police using the 13applicant's digital driver's license or Illinois 14Identification Card photograph, if available, and signature on 15the applicant's Firearm Owner's Identification Card. The 16Secretary of State shall allow the Illinois State Police 17access to the photograph and signature for the purpose of 18identifying the applicant and issuing to the applicant a 19Firearm Owner's Identification Card.20    (c) The Secretary of State shall conduct a study to 21determine the cost and feasibility of creating a method of 22adding an identifiable code, background, or other means on the 23driver's license or Illinois Identification Card to show that 24an individual is not disqualified from owning or possessing a 25firearm under State or federal law. The Secretary shall report 26the findings of this study August 17, 2002 (12 months after the   SB2677- 3 -LRB104 14096 RLC 27228 b1effective date of Public Act 92-442).2    (c-5) If a person qualifies for a photograph exemption, in 3lieu of a photograph, the Firearm Owner's Identification Card 4shall contain a copy of the card holder's fingerprints. Each 5Firearm Owner's Identification Card described in this 6subsection (c-5) must have printed on it the following: "This 7card is only valid for firearm purchases through a federally 8licensed firearms dealer when presented with photographic 9identification, as prescribed by 18 U.S.C. 922(t)(1)(C)." 10(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 11102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 12    (430 ILCS 65/13.4)13    Sec. 13.4. Illinois State Police; rule making authority. 14The Illinois State Police shall by rule adopt the following 15procedures:16        (1) When a person who possesses a valid Firearm 17    Owner's Identification Card applies for and is approved 18    for a concealed carry license, the valid Firearm Owner's 19    Identification Card is renewed for 10 years from the time 20    of approval instead of 10 years from the date of the 21    original card.22        (2) If a person is eligible for both a Firearm Owner's 23    Identification Card and a concealed carry license, the 24    Illinois State Police shall by rule create one card that 25    may be used as both a Firearm Owner's Identification Card   SB2677- 4 -LRB104 14096 RLC 27228 b1    and a concealed carry license. A combined Firearm Owner's 2    Identification Card and concealed carry license shall be 3    considered a valid card for the purposes of this Act. The 4    expiration date of a combined Firearm Owner's 5    Identification Card and concealed carry license issued on 6    or after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 7    104th General Assembly must be boldly and conspicuously 8    displayed on the face of the card and must clearly 9    identify the expiration date of the person's Firearm 10    Owner's Identification Card and the expiration date of the 11    person's concealed carry license. If a person who 12    possesses a combined Firearm Owner's Identification Card 13    and a concealed carry license becomes subject to 14    suspension or revocation under the Firearm Concealed Carry 15    Act, but is otherwise eligible for a valid Firearm Owner's 16    Identification Card, the Illinois State Police shall 17    ensure the person's Firearm Owner's Identification Card 18    status is not interrupted. The Illinois State Police shall 19    adopt rules to implement this Section.20(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22.)